Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1204
Separate election; joint election; costs; political subdivisions; duties.

(1) Every political subdivision shall pay the cost of holding and conducting a separate election on its behalf by the election commissioner or county clerk. The election commissioner or county clerk shall fix and certify the total cost of the separate election to the political subdivision involved. Total cost shall include all chargeable costs as provided in section 32-1202.

(2) Except as provided in section 32-1203, if any two or more political subdivisions hold a joint election, the election commissioner or county clerk shall fix and certify to each political subdivision joining in such election the portion of the total cost which each shall bear.

(3) If a special issue is placed on the ballot of a joint or separate election by any political subdivision, the election commissioner or county clerk shall charge such political subdivision for any additional costs in printing ballots and in publication.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 369.